Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 4
DEFERRED PROSECUTION
AND DEFERRED SENTENCING

16-7-401. Deferred prosecution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 224, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-7-401.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 610, § 1, effective June 26.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 860, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 930, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 664, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 616, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2036, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-101.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-7-402. Counseling or treatment for alcohol or drug abuse. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 224, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-7-402.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 930, § 2, effective May 13.

L. 82:

(1) repealed, p. 309, § 2, effective March 11.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 235, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(3) added, p. 658, § 6, effective May 30.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 665, § 8, effective May 28; (3) amended, p. 1182, § 6, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

House Bill 02-1229 amended subsection (2). Senate Bill 02-010 amended subsection (3). This section as amended by House Bill 02-1229 and Senate Bill 02-010 was subsequently harmonized with House Bill 02-1046 and relocated to section 18-1.3-210.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-7-403. Deferred sentencing of defendant. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 611, § 1, effective February 9.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 664, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 617, § 8, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1371, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 614, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1727, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1541, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(4) added, p. 948, § 8, effective May 27.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 760, § 9, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

House Bill 02-1225 amended subsection (2). This section as amended by House Bill 02-1225 was subsequently harmonized with House Bill 02-1046 and relocated to section 18-1.3-102.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-7-403.5. Deferred sentencing - mentally ill defendants charged with certain misdemeanors - demonstration program - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1279, § 1, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2001. (See L. 96, p. 1279.)

16-7-403.7. Deferred sentencing - drug offenders - legislative declaration - demonstration program - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 489, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 979, § 1, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Senate Bill 02-018 amended subsection (5). This section as amended by Senate Bill 02-018 was subsequently harmonized with House Bill 02-1046 and relocated to section 18-1.3-103. Section 18-1.3-103 was subsequently repealed, effective July 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-7-404. Charges for bad checks.

The department or agency supervising the collection of restitution ordered as a condition of a deferred prosecution or deferred sentence pursuant to this part 4 may assess a charge of fifteen dollars to a defendant for collection of each bad check or each bad check received as a restitution payment. For the purposes of this section, "bad check" means a check or similar sight order for the payment of money which is dishonored by the bank or other drawee because the issuer does not have sufficient funds upon deposit with the bank or other drawee to pay the check or order upon presentation within thirty days after issue.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 488, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For charges for bad checks received as a restitution payment ordered as a condition of a plea agreement, see § 16-7-304; for assessment of a penalty for a dishonored check presented as a payment for restitution, see § 16-18.5-108.